Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
State Advisory Council

173.810.
State Advisory Council on Libraries. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 367, § 1; 1978, ch. 154, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 288, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 405, § 34, effective July 15, 1994; 2007, ch. 65, § 3, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 58, effective June 25, 2009; repealed by 2018 ch. 176, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

173.850.
Definitions for KRS 173.860 and 173.870.

Unless the context otherwise requires:

“State librarian” means the state librarian as defined in KRS

171.130

;

“Governmental unit” means any county or city or urban-county government or other agency or instrumentality which is authorized by Kentucky Revised Statutes to levy and collect taxes for public purposes; and

“Qualifying library” means any free public library supported in whole or in part with money derived from taxation, and governed by a board as provided for in KRS

173.040

,

173.340

,

173.500

or

173.725

, which is located in any county containing a city of the first class, a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, an urban-county government, or any county in which there are no incorporated areas.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 383, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 327, § 8, effective July 15, 1988; 2014, ch. 92, § 245, effective January 1, 2015.

173.860.
Urban libraries fund — Source of money.

There is hereby created the urban libraries fund for distribution to qualifying libraries as defined by KRS

173.850

. The fund shall be administered pursuant to the provisions of KRS

173.870

. The fund shall consist of such sums as are appropriated by the General Assembly, and any grants, gifts, legacies, devises, or other funds or property from any available source, public or private. The receipt, control, and expenditure of funds shall be subject to the general provisions of KRS Chapters 41 to 47, governing financial administration of state agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 383, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 327, § 9, effective July 15, 1988; 2002, ch. 346, § 181, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 246, effective January 1, 2015.

173.870.
Allocation of funds.

The state librarian shall annually on September 1 cause the State Treasurer to pay to each qualifying library out of the urban libraries fund, to the extent that funds are available, the sums computed as follows:

The sum of twenty-five cents ($0.25) for each resident of the county containing a qualifying library based on the then current census of such county supplied by the Bureau of Census, United States Department of Commerce; and

The remainder of available funds shall be divided equally between each qualifying library as defined by KRS

173.850

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 383, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 237, § 10, effective July 15, 1988; 2014, ch. 92, § 247, effective January 1, 2015.